el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Θαλάσσια σπορ με ρυμούλκηση > Σέρφινγκ με ρυμουλκούμενο: Δέστρες kiteboard & wakeboard; Σάκοι έρματος (ballast) wakeboard; Ανταλλακτικά wakeboard; Wakeboards; Σανίδες wakefoil; Wakeskates; Σανίδες wakesurf
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Velkamasis vandens sportas > Vandenlenčių sportas: Aitvarų lentų ir vandenlenčių apkaustai; Wakeboard balasto krepšiai; Vandenlenčių dalys; Vandenlentės; Wakefoil lentos; Wakeskate riedlentės; Wakesurf lentos
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Катание по воде за катером > Вейкбординг: Крепления для кайтбордов и вейкбордов; Балластные мешки для вейкбординга; Детали для вейкбордов; Вейкборды; Вейкфойлборды; Вейкскейты; Доски для вейксерфинга
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Sporturi nautice cu remorcare > Wakeboarding: Legături pentru kiteboard și wakeboard; Saci de balast pentru wakeboard; Piese pentru wakeboard; Plăci pentru wakeboarding; Plăci pentru wakefoil; Wakeskate-uri; Plăci pentru wakesurf
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Desportos aquáticos de reboque > Wakeboard: Fixadores para pranchas de wakeboard e kiteboard; Sacos de lastro para wakeboard; Peças para pranchas de wakeboard; Pranchas de wakeboard; Pranchas de wakefoil; Wakeskates; Pranchas de wakesurf
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Vontatott vízi sportok > Wakeboardozás: Kiteboard- és wakeboard-kötések; Wakeboard ballasztzsákok; Wakeboard-alkatrészek; Wakeboardok; Wakefoil deszkák; Wakeskate-ek; Wakesurf deszkák
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Seilgebundene Wassersportarten > Wakeboarding: Kiteboard- & Wakeboard-Bindungen; Wakeboard-Ballastsäcke; Wakeboard-Ersatzteile; Wakeboards; Wakefoil-Boards; Wakeskates; Wakesurf-Boards
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Vlečné vodné športy > Wakeboarding: Viazania na kiteboardy a wakeboardy; Záťažové vaky na wakeboard; Diely na wakeboard; Wakeboardy; Dosky Wakefoil; Wakeskate; Dosky na wakesurf
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Vlečné vodní sporty > Jízda na vodních prknech: Vázání na vodní prkna a kiteboardy; Zátěžové vaky pro wakeboarding; Součásti pro vodní prkna; Vodní prkna; Wakefoil boardy; Wakeskaty; Wakesurfy
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Sporty wodne holowane > Wakeboarding: Mocowania do kiteboardingu i wakeboardingu; Torby balastowe do wakeboardingu; Części do wakeboardingu; Deski do wakeboardingu; Deski do wakefoila; Deski do wakeskate'a; Deski do wakesurfingu
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Esportes aquáticos rebocados > Wakeboard: Leashes para kiteboard e wakeboard; Sacos de lastro para wakeboard; Peças para wakeboard; Pranchas de esqui aquático; Pranchas de wakefoil; Wakeskates; Pranchas de wakesurf
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Sports nautiques tractés > Wakeboard: Fixations pour planches de kitesurf et wakeboard; Sacs de ballast de wakeboard; Pièces de wakeboard; Planches de wakeboard; Planches de wakefoil; Wakeskates; Planches de wakesurf
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Vattensporter med draglina > Wakeboarding: Kiteboard- och wakeboardbindningar; Ballastsäckar för wakeboard; Wakeboarddelar; Wakeboardbrädor; Wakefoil-brädor; Wakeskates; Wakesurf-brädor
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Водни спортове с теглене > Уейкборд: Автомати за уейкборд и кайтборд; Баластни торби за уейкборд; Части за уейкборд; Уейкбордове; Дъски за уейкфойл; Уейкскейт; Дъски за уейксърф
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 滑水用品 > 尾波滑水: 风筝冲浪板与尾波固定器; 尾波压载袋; 尾波滑水板部件; 花式滑水板; 尾波水翼板; 尾波滑板; 尾波冲浪板
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 견인식 수상 스포츠 > 웨이크보딩: 카이트보드/웨이크보드 바인딩; 웨이크보드 밸러스트 백; 웨이크보드 부품; 웨이크보드; 웨이크포일 보드; 웨이크스케이트; 웨이크서프 보드
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > トーイングアクティビティ > ウェイクボード用品: カイトボード・ウェイクボード用ビンディング; ウェイクボード用バラストバッグ; ウェイクボード用パーツ; ウェイクボード; ウェイクフォイルボード; ウェイクスケート; ウェイクサーフボード
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Towed Water Sports > Wakeboarding: Kiteboard & Wakeboard Bindings; Wakeboard Ballast Bags; Wakeboard Parts; Wakeboards; Wakefoil Boards; Wakeskates; Wakesurf Boards
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván có thuyền kéo > Lướt ván sóng: Bộ phận gắn vào ván dù và ván trượt nước; Túi đối trọng wakeboard; Ván lướt sóng trên cao; Ván trượt nước; Ván cánh ngầm wakefoil; Ván trượt nước wakeskate; Ván wakesurf
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Çekmeli Su Sporları > Wakeboard Sporu: Uçurtma Sörfü ve Su Kayağı Bağları; Wakeboard balast çantaları; Su Kayağı Parçaları; Wakeboard Tahtaları; Wakefoil tahtaları; Wakeskate'ler; Wakesurf tahtaları
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Vesiurheilulajit veneen perässä > Wakeboarding: Leijalautailu- ja wakeboard-siteet; Wakeboard-painolastipussit; Wakeboardien osat; Wakeboardit; Wakefoil-laudat; Wakeskatet; Wakesurf-laudat
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Sport nautici con traino > Wakeboard: Attacchi per tavole da wakeboard e kiteboard; Sacche di zavorra per wakeboard; Parti per tavole da wakeboard; Tavole da wakeboard; Tavole da wakefoil; Wakeskate; Tavole da wakesurf
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Deportes acuáticos remolcados > Tablaestela: Fijaciones para tablas de kiteboard y wakeboard; Bolsas de lastre para wakeboard; Piezas de tablas de wakeboard; Tablas de tablaestela; Tablas de wakefoil; Wakeskates; Tablas de wakesurf
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > กีฬาทางน้ำแบบลาก > การเล่นเวคบอร์ด: สายมัดสำหรับไคท์บอร์ดและเวกบอร์ด; ถุงถ่วงน้ำหนักเวคบอร์ด; ชิ้นส่วนเวคบอร์ด; เวคบอร์ด; กระดานเวคฟอยล์; เวคสเก็ต; กระดานเวคเซิร์ฟ
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 纜繩滑水 > 寬板滑水: 風箏衝浪和水上滑板腳套; 尾波滑水壓艙袋; 滑水板零件; 滑水板; 尾波水翼板; 尾波滑板; 快艇衝浪板
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Vlečni športi na vodi > Deskanje na vodi: Vezi za kajtanje in deskanje na vodi; Vreče za obtežitev za wakeboardanje; Deli za deskanje na vodi; Deske za deskanje na vodi; Wakefoil deske; Wakeskate deske; Deske za wakesurfing
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Vandsport, hvor man trækkes > Wakeboarding: Bindinger til kite- og wakeboards; Ballastposer til wakeboards; Dele til wakeboards; Wakeboards; Wakefoil-brætter; Wakeskates; Wakesurf-brætter
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Vučni vodeni sportovi > Wakeboard: Vezice za kiteboard i wakeboard daske; Vreće s balastom za wakeboard; Dijelovi wakeboard daske; Wakeboard daske; Daske za wakefoiling; Wakeskate; Daske za wakesurfing
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Watersporten met motorische aandrijving > Wakeboarden: Bindingen voor kiteboards en wakeboards; Wakeboard-ballastzakken; Onderdelen voor wakeboards; Wakeboards; Wakefoilboards; Wakeskates; Wakesurfboards
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Trukket vannsport > Wakeboarding: Bindinger for kiteboards og wakeboards; Ballastposer til wakeboard; Wakeboarddeler; Wakeboards; Wakefoil-brett; Wakeskates; Wakesurf-brett